Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.13 Long-Term Managed Care Arrangements

40-8.13-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this section the following terms shall have the meanings indicated:

“Beneficiary” means an individual who is eligible for medical assistance under the Rhode Island Medicaid state plan established in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1396, and includes individuals who are additionally eligible for benefits under the Medicare program (42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.) or other health plan.

“Duals demonstration project” means a demonstration project established pursuant to the financial alignment demonstration established under section 2602 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Pub. L. No. 111-148) [42 U.S.C. § 1315b], involving a three-way contract between Rhode Island, the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (“CMS”), and qualified health plans, and covering healthcare services provided to beneficiaries.

“EOHHS” means the Rhode Island executive office of health and human services.

“EOHHS level-of-care tool” refers to a set of criteria established by EOHHS and used in January, 2014 to determine the long-term-care needs of a beneficiary as well as the appropriate setting for delivery of that care.

“Long-term-care services and supports” means a spectrum of services covered by the Rhode Island Medicaid program and/or the Medicare program, that are required by individuals with functional impairments and/or chronic illness, and includes skilled or custodial nursing facility care, as well as various home- and community-based services.

“Managed care organization” means any health plan, health-maintenance organization, managed care plan, or other person or entity that enters into a contract with the state under which it is granted the authority to arrange for the provision of, and/or payment for, long-term-care supports and services to eligible beneficiaries under a managed long-term-care arrangement.

“Managed long-term-care arrangement” means any arrangement under which a managed care organization is granted some or all of the responsibility for providing and/or paying for long-term-care services and supports that would otherwise be provided or paid under the Rhode Island Medicaid program. The term includes, but is not limited to, a duals demonstration project, and/or phase I and phase II of the integrated care initiative established by the executive office of health and human services.

“Plan of care” means a care plan established by a nursing facility in accordance with state and federal regulations and that identifies specific care and services provided to a beneficiary.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-2.
Beneficiary choice.

Any managed long-term-care arrangement shall offer beneficiaries the option to decline participation and remain in traditional Medicaid and, if a duals demonstration project, traditional Medicare. Beneficiaries must be provided with sufficient information to make an informed choice regarding enrollment, including:

Any changes in the beneficiary’s payment or other financial obligations with respect to long-term-care services and supports as a result of enrollment;

Any changes in the nature of the long-term-care services and supports available to the beneficiary as a result of enrollment, including specific descriptions of new services that will be available or existing services that will be curtailed or terminated;

A contact person who can assist the beneficiary in making decisions about enrollment;

Individualized information regarding whether the managed care organization’s network includes the healthcare providers with whom beneficiaries have established provider relationships. Directing beneficiaries to a website identifying the plan’s provider network shall not be sufficient to satisfy this requirement; and

The deadline by which the beneficiary must make a choice regarding enrollment, and the length of time a beneficiary must remain enrolled in a managed care organization before being permitted to change plans or opt out of the arrangement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-3.
Ombudsman process.

EOHHS shall designate an ombudsperson to advocate for beneficiaries enrolled in a managed long-term-care arrangement. The ombudsperson shall advocate for beneficiaries through complaint and appeal processes and ensure that necessary healthcare services are provided. At the time of enrollment, a managed care organization must inform enrollees of the availability of the ombudsperson, including contact information.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-4.
Provider/plan liaison.

EOHHS shall designate an individual, not employed by or otherwise under contract with a participating managed care organization, who shall act as liaison between healthcare providers and managed care organizations, for the purpose of facilitating communications and ensuring that issues and concerns are promptly addressed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-5.
Financial principles under managed care.

To the extent that financial savings are a goal under any managed long-term-care arrangement, it is the intent of the legislature to achieve savings through administrative efficiencies, care coordination, improvements in care outcomes and in a way that encourages the highest quality care for patients and maximizes value for the managed-care organization and the state. Therefore, any managed long-term-care arrangement shall include a requirement that the managed care organization reimburse providers for services in accordance with these principles. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2015, Medicaid managed long-term-care payment rates to nursing facilities established pursuant to this section shall not exceed ninety-eight percent (98.0%) of the rates in effect on April 1, 2015.

For a duals demonstration project, the managed care organization:

Shall not combine the rates of payment for post-acute skilled and rehabilitation care provided by a nursing facility and long-term and chronic care provided by a nursing facility in order to establish a single-payment rate for dual eligible beneficiaries requiring skilled nursing services;

Shall pay nursing facilities providing post-acute skilled and rehabilitation care or long-term and chronic care rates that reflect the different level of services and intensity required to provide these services; and

For purposes of determining the appropriate rate for the type of care identified in subsection (a)(1)(ii) of this section, the managed care organization shall pay no less than the rates that would be paid for that care under traditional Medicare and Rhode Island Medicaid for these service types. The managed care organization shall not, however, be required to use the same payment methodology.

The state shall not enter into any agreement with a managed care organization in connection with a duals demonstration project unless that agreement conforms to this section, and any existing such agreement shall be amended as necessary to conform to this subsection.

For a managed long-term-care arrangement that is not a duals demonstration project, the managed care organization shall reimburse providers in an amount not less than the amount that would be paid for the same care by the executive office of health and human services under the Medicaid program. The managed care organization shall not, however, be required to use the same payment methodology as the executive office of health and human services.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the general or public laws to the contrary, the protections of subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section may be waived by a nursing facility in the event it elects to accept a payment model developed jointly by the managed care organization and skilled nursing facilities, that is intended to promote quality of care and cost-effectiveness, including, but not limited to, bundled-payment initiatives, value-based purchasing arrangements, gainsharing, and similar models.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2015, Medicaid managed long-term-care payment rates to nursing facilities established pursuant to this section shall not exceed ninety-eight percent (98.0%) of the rates in effect on April 1, 2015.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 18; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 6.

40-8.13-6.
Payment incentives.

In order to encourage quality improvement and promote appropriate utilization incentives for providers in a managed long-term-care arrangement, a managed care organization may use incentive or bonus payment programs that are in addition to the rates identified in §

40-8.13-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-7.
Willing provider.

A managed care organization must contract with and cover services furnished by any nursing facility licensed under chapter 17 of title 23 and certified by CMS that provides Medicaid-covered nursing facility services pursuant to a provider agreement with the state, provided that the nursing facility is not disqualified under the managed care organization’s quality standards that are applicable to all nursing facilities; and the nursing facility is willing to accept the reimbursement rates described in §

40-8.13-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-8.
Level-of-care tool.

A managed long-term-care arrangement must require that all participating managed care organizations use only the EOHHS level-of-care tool in determining coverage of long-term-care supports and services for beneficiaries. EOHHS may amend the level-of-care tool provided that any changes are established in consultation with beneficiaries and providers of Medicaid-covered long-term-care supports and services, and are based upon reasonable medical evidence or consensus, in consideration of the specific needs of Rhode Island beneficiaries. Notwithstanding any other provisions herein, however, in the case of a duals demonstration project, a managed care organization may use a different level-of-care tool for determining coverage of services that would otherwise be covered by Medicare, since the criteria established by EOHHS are directed towards Medicaid-covered services; provided, that the level-of-care tool is based on reasonable medical evidence or consensus in consideration of the specific needs of Rhode Island beneficiaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-9.
Case management/plan of care.

No managed care organization acting under a managed long-term-care arrangement may require a provider to change a plan of care if the provider reasonably believes that such an action would conflict with the provider’s responsibility to develop an appropriate care plan under state and federal regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-10.
Care transitions.

In the event that a beneficiary:

Has been determined to meet level-of-care requirements for nursing facility coverage as of the date of his or her enrollment in a managed care organization; or

Has been determined to meet level of care requirements for nursing facility coverage by a managed care organization after enrollment; and there is a change in condition whereby the managed care organization determines that the beneficiary no longer meets such level-of-care requirements, the nursing facility shall promptly arrange for an appropriate and safe discharge (with the assistance of the managed care organization if the facility requests it), and the managed care organization shall continue to pay for the beneficiary’s nursing facility care at the same rate until the beneficiary is discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-11.
Reporting requirements.

EOHHS shall report to the general assembly and shall make available to interested persons a separate accounting of state expenditures for long-term-care supports and services under any managed long-term-care arrangement, specifically and separately identifying expenditures for home- and community-based services, assisted-living services, hospice services within nursing facilities, hospice services outside of nursing facilities, and nursing facility services. Such reports shall be made twice annually, six (6) months apart, beginning six (6) months following the implementation of any managed long-term-care arrangement, and shall include a detailed report of utilization of each service. In order to facilitate reporting, any managed long-term-care arrangement shall include a requirement that a participating managed care organization make timely reports of the data necessary to compile the reports.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 6.

40-8.13-12.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 19; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 9; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.